Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-671
Traffic control signal, defined.

Traffic control signal shall mean any signal, whether manually, electrically, or mechanically operated, by which traffic is alternately directed to stop and permitted to proceed.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 167.